Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 12
CHALLENGE OF PERSONS VOTING

1-13.5-1201. No voting unless eligible.

Unless otherwise permitted pursuant to section 1-13.5-605, no person is permitted to vote at any local government election unless his or her name is found on the registration list or property owners list, if applicable, or unless the person's registration or property ownership is confirmed orally as provided by section 1-13.5-605 (3).

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 49, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1202. Right to vote may be challenged.

When any person whose name appears on the registration list or property owners list applies for a ballot, his or her right to vote at that election may be challenged. If the person applying is not entitled to vote, no ballot shall be delivered to him or her. Any person may also be challenged when he or she offers a ballot for deposit in the ballot box.

It is the duty of any election judge to challenge any person offering to vote who he or she believes is not an eligible elector. In addition, challenges may be made by watchers or any eligible elector of the local government who is present.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 49, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1203. Challenge to be made by written oath.

Each challenge must be made by written oath, signed by the challenger under penalty of perjury, setting forth the name of the person challenged and the basis for the challenge. The election judges shall deliver all challenges and oaths to the designated election official at the time the other election papers are returned. The designated election official shall deliver all challenges and oaths to the district attorney for investigation and appropriate action as soon as possible.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 49, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1204. Challenge questions asked.

If a person offering to vote is challenged as unqualified, one of the election judges shall tender to him or her the following written oath or affirmation: "You do solemnly swear or affirm that you will fully and truly answer all such questions as are put to you regarding your place of residence and qualifications as an eligible elector at this election."

If the person is challenged as unqualified on the ground that he or she is not a citizen and will not exhibit papers pertaining to naturalization, an election judge shall ask the following question: "Are you a citizen of the United States?"

If the person is challenged as unqualified on the ground that he or she is not a resident of the local government, an election judge shall ask the following questions:

"Have you resided in the local government immediately preceding this election?"

"Have you been absent from the local government immediately preceding this election, and during that time have you maintained a home or domicile elsewhere?"

"If so, when you left, was it for a temporary purpose with the intent of returning, or did you intend to remain away?"

"Did you, while absent, look upon and regard this state as your home?"

"Did you, while absent, vote in any other state or territory?"

If the person is challenged as ineligible because the person is not a property owner or the spouse or civil union partner of a property owner, an election judge shall ask the following questions:

"Are you a property owner or the spouse or civil union partner of a property owner in this political subdivision and therefore eligible to vote?"

"What is the address or, for special district elections where an address is not available, the location of the property that entitles you to vote in this election?"

If the person is challenged as unqualified on the ground that the person is not eighteen years of age, an election judge shall ask the following question: "Are you eighteen years of age or over to the best of your knowledge and belief?"

An election judge shall put all other questions to the person challenged as may be necessary to test the person's qualifications as an eligible elector at the election.

If the person challenged answers satisfactorily all of the questions put to him or her, the person shall sign his or her name on the form of the challenge after the printed questions. The election judges shall indicate in the proper place on the form of challenge whether the challenge was withdrawn and whether the challenged voter refused to answer the questions and left the polling place without voting.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 49, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1205. Oath of person challenged.

If the challenge is not withdrawn after the person offering to vote has answered the questions asked pursuant to section 1-13.5-1204, one of the election judges shall tender the following oath:

After the person has taken the oath or affirmation, his or her ballot must be received and the word "sworn" must be written on the pollbook after the person's name.

You do solemnly swear or affirm that you are a citizen of the United States of the age of eighteen years or over; that you have been a resident of this local government and have not retained a home or domicile elsewhere, or that you or your spouse or civil union partner are owners of taxable real or personal property within the local government; that you are a registered elector of this state; and that you have not previously voted at this election.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 50, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1206. Refusal to answer questions or take oath.

If the challenged person refuses to answer fully any question which is put to him or her as provided in section 1-13.5-1204 or refuses to take the oath or affirmation tendered as provided in section 1-13.5-1205, the election judges shall reject the challenged person's vote.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 51, § 6, effective February 18.